tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/fr_FR.aff
SFX y Y 73
SFX y   er         è-je       er
SFX y   er         é          er
SFX y   er         és         er
SFX y   er         ée         er
SFX y   er         ées        er
SFX y   ir         i          [^o]ir
SFX y   r          s          [^o]ir
SFX y   r          e          [^o]ir
SFX y   r          es         [^o]ir
SFX y   cevoir     çu         cevoir
SFX y   cevoir     çus        cevoir
SFX y   cevoir     çue        cevoir
SFX y   cevoir     çues       cevoir
SFX y   re         u          [pd]re
SFX y   re         us         [pd]re
SFX y   re         ue         [pd]re
SFX y   re         ues        [pd]re
SFX y   re         ts         [au]ire
SFX y   re         te         [au]ire
SFX y   re         tes        [au]ire
SFX y   ire        u          lire
SFX y   ire        ue         lire
SFX y   ire        ues        lire
SFX y   re         t          [dfr]ire
SFX y   re         ts         [dfr]ire
SFX y   re         te         [dfr]ire
SFX y   re         tes        [dfr]ire
SFX y   re         s          cire 
SFX y   ettre      is         mettre
SFX y   ettre      ise        mettre
SFX y   ettre      ises       mettre
SFX y   re         u          battre
SFX y   re         ue         battre
SFX y   re         us         battre
SFX y   re         ues        battre
SFX y   aître      u          [nr]aître
SFX y   aître      us         [nr]aître
SFX y   aître      ue         [nr]aître
SFX y   aître      ues        [nr]aître
SFX y   re         s          clore
SFX y   re         se         clore
SFX y   re         ses        clore
SFX y   ure        u          clure
SFX y   ure        us         clure
SFX y   re         e          clure
SFX y   re         es         clure
SFX y   oire       u          oire
SFX y   oire       us         oire
SFX y   oire       ue         oire
SFX y   oire       ues        oire
SFX y   oître      û          croître
SFX y   oître      us         croître
SFX y   oître      ue         croître
SFX y   oître      ues        croître
SFX y   ïr         ï          haïr
SFX y   r          s          haïr
SFX y   r          e          haïr
SFX y   r          es         haïr
SFX y   re         u          vaincre
SFX y   re         us         vaincre
SFX y   re         ue         vaincre
SFX y   re         ues        vaincre
SFX y   re         i          suivre
SFX y   re         is         suivre
SFX y   re         ie         suivre
SFX y   re         ies        suivre
SFX y   ivre       écu        vivre
SFX y   ivre       écus       vivre
SFX y   ivre       écue       vivre
SFX y   ivre       écues      vivre
SFX y   eoir       is         seoir
SFX y   eoir       ise        seoir
SFX y   eoir       ises       seoir

SFX z Y 44
SFX z   érir       is         érir
SFX z   érir       ise        érir
SFX z   érir       ises       érir
SFX z   rir        ert        vrir
SFX z   rir        erts       vrir
SFX z   rir        erte       vrir
SFX z   rir        ertes      vrir
SFX z   ir         u          [^o]ir
SFX z   ir         us         [^o]ir
SFX z   ir         ue         [^o]ir
SFX z   ir         ues        [^o]ir
SFX z   oir        u          loir
SFX z   oir        us         loir
SFX z   oir        ue         loir
SFX z   oir        ues        loir
SFX z   dre        t          indre
SFX z   dre        ts         indre
SFX z   dre        te         indre
SFX z   dre        tes        indre
SFX z   endre      is         endre
SFX z   endre      ise        endre
SFX z   endre      ises       endre
SFX z   dre        su         coudre
SFX z   dre        sus        coudre
SFX z   dre        sue        coudre
SFX z   dre        sues       coudre
SFX z   dre        lu         moudre
SFX z   dre        lus        moudre
SFX z   dre        lue        moudre
SFX z   dre        lues       moudre
SFX z   aître      é          naître
SFX z   aître      és         naître
SFX z   aître      ée         naître
SFX z   aître      ées        naître
SFX z   re         ts         [és]crire
SFX z   re         te         [és]crire
SFX z   re         tes        [és]crire
SFX z   ure        us         clure
SFX z   re         se         clure
SFX z   re         ses        clure
SFX z   oître      u          croître
SFX z   oître      us         croître
SFX z   oître      ue         croître
SFX z   oître      ues        croître

SFX p N 83
SFX p   0          nt         e
SFX p   e          èrent      [^è][^è].e
SFX p   0          ra         e
SFX p   0          ront       e
SFX p   0          rait       e
SFX p   0          raient     e
SFX p   ie         yèrent     [aou]ie
SFX p   elle       elèrent    elle
SFX p   ère        érèrent    ère
SFX p   ère        érera      ère
SFX p   ère        éreront    ère
SFX p   ère        érerait    ère
SFX p   ère        éreraient  ère
SFX p   ège        égèrent    ège
SFX p   ège        égera      ège
SFX p   ège        égeront    ège
SFX p   ège        égerait    ège
SFX p   ège        égeraient  ège
SFX p   ève        evèrent    ève
SFX p   0          ra         ève
SFX p   0          ront       ève
SFX p   0          rait       ève
SFX p   0          raient     ève
SFX p   ène        énèrent    [^mr]ène
SFX p   ène        énera      [^mr]ène
SFX p   ène        éneront    [^mr]ène
SFX p   ène        énerait    [^mr]ène
SFX p   ène        éneraient  [^mr]ène
SFX p   ène        enèrent    [mr]ène
SFX p   0          ra         [mr]ène
SFX p   0          ront       [mr]ène
SFX p   0          rait       [mr]ène
SFX p   0          raient     [mr]ène
SFX p   ète        étèrent    [^h]ète
SFX p   ète        étera      [^h]ète
SFX p   ète        éteront    [^h]ète
SFX p   ète        éterait    [^h]ète
SFX p   ète        éteraient  [^h]ète
SFX p   ète        etèrent    chète
SFX p   0          ra         chète
SFX p   0          ront       chète
SFX p   0          rait       chète
SFX p   0          raient     chète
SFX p   èle        elèrent    èle
SFX p   0          ra         èle
SFX p   0          ront       èle
SFX p   0          rait       èle
SFX p   0          raient     èle
SFX p   èche       échèrent   èche
SFX p   èche       échera     èche
SFX p   èche       écheront   èche
SFX p   èche       écherait   èche
SFX p   èche       écheraient èche
SFX p   èque       équèrent   èque
SFX p   èque       équera     èque
SFX p   èque       équeront   èque
SFX p   èque       équerait   èque
SFX p   èque       équeraient èque
SFX p   ètre       étrèrent   ètre
SFX p   ètre       étrera     ètre
SFX p   ètre       étreront   ètre
SFX p   ètre       étrerait   ètre
SFX p   ètre       étreraient ètre
SFX p   ègne       égnèrent   ègne
SFX p   ègne       égnera     ègne
SFX p   ègne       égneront   ègne
SFX p   ègne       égnerait   ègne
SFX p   ègne       égneraient ègne
SFX p   ègre       égrèrent   ègre
SFX p   ègre       égrera     ègre
SFX p   ègre       égreront   ègre
SFX p   ègre       égrerait   ègre
SFX p   ègre       égreraient ègre
SFX p   èvre       évrèrent   èvre
SFX p   èvre       évrera     èvre
SFX p   èvre       évreront   èvre
SFX p   èvre       évrerait   èvre
SFX p   èvre       évreraient èvre
SFX p   t          ent        ait
SFX p   ait        a          ait
SFX p   it         nt         ait
SFX p   ait        ât         ait
SFX p   it         ssent      ait

SFX q N 14
SFX q   ïssait     it         ïssait
SFX q   ssait      t          [^ï]ssait
SFX q   ait        e          ssait
SFX q   ait        ent        ssait
SFX q   t          ent        ssait
SFX q   it         nt         ssait
SFX q   ssait      t          ïssait
SFX q   ssait      rent       ssait
SFX q   ïssait     ît         ïssait
SFX q   issait     ît         issait
SFX q   ssait      ra         ssait
SFX q   ssait      ront       ssait
SFX q   ssait      rait       ssait
SFX q   ssait      raient     ssait
